Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.415

Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program—Short title.

RCW 28A.300.390 through 28A.300.415 shall be known as the Washington civil liberties public education act.

[ 2000 c 210 s 7.]